Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 15. Tuition And Fees For Survivors or Dependents of Emergency Responders

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

§ 21-16-1501.
Free tuition and fees for education of survivors or dependents of deceased or disabled peace officers, firefighters and emergency medical technicians.

The University of Wyoming or any Wyoming community college for up to ten (10) semesters shall provide free tuition and fees for any person who is a surviving dependent of any person described in subsection (g) of this section or the dependent of any disabled person described in subsection (h) of this section. If the surviving dependent first enrolls in a community college and then transfers to another community college or the University of Wyoming, the free tuition and fees shall continue until the dependent has completed a cumulative total of ten (10) semesters at the community college level and the university.

In order to qualify for the benefit under this section, a person claiming eligibility for free tuition and fees under this section shall be under twenty-two (22) years of age at the time of the death of the parent or legal guardian described in subsection (g) of this section or at the time of the qualifying disability described in subsection (j) of this section, and at the time of first enrollment claiming eligibility for benefits under this section. No person shall be eligible for the benefits provided under this section for any semester commencing more than eight (8) academic years after the semester in which the person initially receives benefits under this section. The institution in which the student enrolls shall grant exceptions to the requirements of this subsection for military service, religious service or other good cause shown, which exceptions shall be consistent with rules promulgated by the Wyoming department of education for the Hathaway scholarship program under W.S. 21-16-1303(b)(iii)(B) and (d).

Upon application by a person claiming eligibility for free tuition and fees under this section because of the death or qualifying disability of a parent or legal guardian, the University of Wyoming or the Wyoming community college where the person applied for enrollment shall:

Determine whether the deceased or disabled person was an individual specified in subsection (g) or (h) of this section;

Determine whether the person died or suffered a qualifying disability while acting within the scope of his duties; and

Certify whether the person claiming eligibility for free tuition and fees under this section is qualified to receive free tuition and fees under this section.

A person who had qualified for free tuition and fees under subsection (b) of this section, shall be deemed eligible for the free tuition and fees at any Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming up to the maximum number of semesters of study allowed under subsection (a) of this section, if the person transfers to another institution specified in subsection (a) of this section.

For purposes of paragraph (c)(ii) of this section, it shall be conclusively presumed that the decedent died while acting within the scope of duties if death benefits were paid as a result of the death to any person pursuant to the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act.

To remain eligible for benefits under this section, by the end of the spring semester completing the student’s third or fourth semester of attendance, the student shall have a cumulative grade point average of at least two point zero (2.0) and shall maintain a cumulative grade point average of at least two point zero (2.0) at the end of each subsequent spring semester to continue to receive the free tuition and fees.

The benefits provided in subsections (a) through (f) of this section shall be provided to the surviving dependents of the following:

A peace officer who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-709

and who died while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a law enforcement agency in the state;

A paid or volunteer fire fighter who died while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a paid or volunteer fire department or district in the state;

A paid or volunteer emergency medical technician who died while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a paid or volunteer ambulance service in the state, when responding at the request of a public agency to assist in a civil or military emergency, or natural or human caused disaster.

The benefits provided in subsections (a) through (g) of this section shall be provided to the dependents of the following:

A peace officer who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-709

and who suffered a qualifying disability while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a law enforcement agency in the state;

A paid or volunteer firefighter who suffered a qualifying disability while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a paid or volunteer fire department or district in the state;

A paid or volunteer emergency medical technician who suffered a qualifying disability while acting within the scope of his duties in the service of a paid or volunteer ambulance service in the state, when responding at the request of a public agency to assist in a civil or military emergency, or natural or human caused disaster.

Limitations on benefits under subsections (a) through (g) of this section shall be applicable to benefits under subsection (h) of this section and references to the decedent’s death shall be construed as references to the qualifying disability. For purposes of subsection (h) of this section, it shall be conclusively presumed that the person suffered a qualifying disability if:

The person’s disability was caused by a specific injury or disease which results primarily from a specific act or occurrence determinable by a definite time or place, from a physical or mental trauma which arises from the nature and in the course of the person’s scope of employment;

The disabled person is unable to continue in the performance of his duties; and

The person is receiving retirement benefits for partial or total disability incurred in the scope of employment, including payments made pursuant to W.S. 9-3-431(f), 9-3-432(h)(i), 9-3-611(a) or 15-5-308(a) or the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 1; ch. 96, § 2; 2008, ch. 32, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

added (h).

Laws 2007, ch. 96, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

added “or the dependent of any disabled person described in subsection (h) of this section” at the end of the first sentence of (a); inserted “or at the time of the qualifying disability described in subsection (j) of this section,” in the first sentence of (b); inserted “or qualifying disability” in the introductory clause of (c); in (c)(i) substituted “deceased or disabled person” for “decedent,” and inserted “or (h)”; in (c)(ii) substituted “person” for “decedent,” and inserted “or suffered a qualifying disability”; added “the following:” in the introductory language of (h); added the (h)(i) designation; added (h)(ii) and (h)(iii); in (j), added the (j) designation, substituted “subsection (h) of this section” for “this subsection” twice in the introductory language of (j); substituted “person's” for “peace officer's” or variants throughout (j), and made related changes; redesignated former (h)(i) through (h)(iii) as (j)(i) through (j)(iii); and in (j)(iii), inserted “, including payments made,” and inserted “9-3-431(f),”.

Laws 2008, ch. 32, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 96, § 3 states in relevant part:

“(b) Section 2 of this act is effective only if 2007 House Bill 112 [Ch. 91] is enacted into law. If section 2 of this act becomes effective it shall be effective upon the effective date of this act as provided in section 4 of this act.”

There is no subsection (i) in this section as itappears in the printed acts.